California, session 20252026, AB99.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 748.3 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:748.3. (a) An electrical corporation shall not propose a rate increase above the rate of inflation, as a systemwide average, for any general rate case cycle.(b)Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an electrical corporation may propose a rate increase above the rate of inflation subject to approval by a majority of the electrical corporation’s voting customers through an election conducted in accordance with all of the following:(1)The electrical corporation shall provide each customer with one ballot.(2)The electrical corporation shall provide each customer with information regarding the proposed rate increase.(3)The commission may set additional procedures and rules for the election.(4)The cost of conducting an election shall be borne exclusively by the shareholders of the electrical corporation.(5)The electrical corporation may propose as many rate plans as necessary until one receives the support of a majority of voting customers.(6)The commission shall determine an interim rate plan, not to exceed the rate of inflation, until an electrical corporation’s proposed rate plan is approved.(c)The commission shall not approve or modify a request to increase rates above the rate of inflation without prior approval by the electrical corporation’s customers based on the results of an election conducted pursuant to subdivision (b).(d)(b) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, subdivision (a), the commission may approve a rate increase above the rate of inflation if the commission determines that the costs underlying the rate increase are directly related to safety enhancements and modernization or to higher commodity or fuel costs.(c) For purposes of this section, “rate of inflation” means the annual increase in the California Consumer Price Index.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.